Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.131

Exemptions—Reflexology.

(1) The secretary may certify an applicant as a reflexologist without examination if the applicant:

(a) Has practiced reflexology as a licensed massage therapist for at least five years prior to July 1, 2013, or provides evidence satisfactory to the secretary that he or she has, prior to July 1, 2013, successfully completed a course of study in a reflexology program approved by the secretary; and

(b) Applies for certification by one year after July 1, 2013.

(2) An applicant holding a reflexology credential in another state or a territory of the United States may be certified to practice in this state without examination if the secretary determines that the other jurisdiction's credentialing standards are substantially equivalent to the standards in this state.

[ 2016 c 41 s 12; 2012 c 137 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 41: See note following RCW 18.108.010.

Finding—Purpose—Rules—Effective date—2012 c 137: See notes following RCW 18.108.005.